Massachusetts, session 194th, H3681.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Chapter 140 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition, is hereby
amended by inserting after section 67A the following section:-
Section 67B. Any person who, being licensed under sections 58 or 59A or who has
affixed to a motor vehicle or trailer dealer registration plates, shall not store or maintain any
motor vehicle or trailer with a dealer registration plate on a public way where residential
dwellings are present on such public way, regardless of whether or not the dealer, licensee or
agent of the licensee or person possessing such dealer registration plate resides there, or whether
no one resides there. A violation of this section shall be subject to the fines and penalties under
section 69.
of 1